Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201880-337
Money or personal property to credit of member of veterans home; claim; disposition; procedure.

Any claim to money or personal property in the hands of the department to the credit of a member of a veterans home shall be disposed of as provided in sections 83-153 to 83-156.

Laws 2018, LB827, § 2.
July 19, 2018